District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Board of Elections Ranked Choice Voting Needs Assessment
Emergency Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2 Section 8a of the District of Columbia Election Code of 1955, effective March 21,
2025 (D.C. Law 25-295), D.C. Official Code § 1-1001.08a), is amended by adding a new
subsection (n) to read as follows:
“(n) No later than January 1, 2027, the Board Shall conduct a comprehensive needs
assessment to support the effective and efficient implementation of Ranked Choice Voting.
“(1) The assessment shall include:
“(A) An institutional readiness review, including:

“(i) An evaluation of Board’s capacity to implement ranked choice
voting, including ballot design, vote tabulation system and associated staff training; and
“(ii) Identification of necessary systems upgrades, operational
process, and logistical requirements for successful implementation;
“(iii) Projected costs of implementation, including equipment,
staffing, technology, translation, accessibility services, and public education.
“(B) Development of proposed regulations governing the implementation
of RCV that includes at a minimum:
“(i) ballot structure, ranking limits, tabulation sequencing, tie-
breaking procedures, ballot adjudication, recount triggers, certification and public reporting
“(ii) a timeline for public notice, comment, final rulemaking and
Council review.
“(C) A public knowledge and perception evaluation to measure:
“(i) General voter awareness and understanding of rank choice
voting; and
“(ii) Targeted analysis of awareness among populations with
limited English proficiency, seniors, and communities with historically low civic engagement;
“(D) An equity and access impact analysis to assess the potential effects of
ranked choice voting on historically unrepresented communities, including Black, Latino, low-
income, and returning citizens populations; and
“(E) A best practices review, including:
“(i) A summary of implementation strategies from other
jurisdiction; and

“(ii) Identification of success factors and common implementation
challenges.
“(2) Upon completion of the assessment, the Board Shall submit to the Mayor and
the Council a report that includes:
“(A) A proposed plan regarding ranked choice voting implementation;
“(B) A timeline for phased implementation that includes critical
milestones; and
“(C) A robust outreach and education plan.”
“(3) The Board of Elections shall not implement or administer any new voting
policies, procedures, or election system modifications, including but not limited to ranked choice
voting, unless it has first conducted a comprehensive needs assessment addressing operational
capacity, budgetary requirements, staffing, technology, public education needs, and equity
impacts and submitted to the Mayor and the Council a detailed implementation plan, finalized
regulations, a budget analysis, and operational timelines with key milestones.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section

412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).